Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2002
Street improvements; additional authorization.

Any city or village may, without petition or creating a street improvement district, order the grading, curbing, guttering, and paving of any side street or alley within its corporate limits connecting with a major traffic street for a distance not to exceed one block from such major traffic street. The improvements authorized by this section may be performed upon any side street or alley not previously improved to meet or exceed the minimum standards for pavement set by the city or village for its paved streets.

Laws 1963, c. 76, § 2, p. 280;

Laws 1965, c. 75, § 2, p. 308;

Laws 1999, LB 738, § 2.

The authorization for special assessment for street improvements in sections 18-2001 to 18-2003 does not extend to a street section already paved. Turner v. City of North Platte, 203 Neb. 706, 279 N.W.2d 868 (1979).